trunk/apertium-eo-ca/apertium-eo-ca.ca.dix
<pardef n="po/c__det">
      
  <e>       <p><l>ques</l>      <r>c<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ca</l>        <r>c<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>cs</l>        <r>c<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>c</l>         <r>c<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/de__det"><!--MG: Inclou contracció amb articles-->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>de</l>        <r>de</r></p><par n="massa__det"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>de</l>    <r>de</r></p><par n="massa__det"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>del</l>       <r>de</r></p><par n="massa__det"/><p><l></l><r><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dels</l>      <r>de</r></p><par n="massa__det"/><p><l></l><r><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="una_mica_de__det">
      
  <e c="MG: cal afegir marca postgeneració en RL a la 'de'"><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="un/s_quants__det">
      
  <e>       <p><l>s<b/>quants</l><r>s<b/>quants<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es<b/>quantes</l><r>s<b/>quants<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>


<pardef n="tercer__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="des/è__det">
      
  <e>       <p><l>enes</l>      <r>è<s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ena</l>       <r>è<s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>è<s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>è<s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
     
</pardef>

<pardef n="tot__predet">
      
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="predet"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="predet"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="predet"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="predet"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
</pardef>


<pardef n="ambd/ós__prn">
      
  <e>       <p><l>ós</l>        <r>ós<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ues</l>       <r>ós<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="tot/s_dos__prn">
      
  <e>       <p><l>s<b/>dos</l>  <r>s<b/>dos<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es<b/>dues</l><r>s<b/>dos<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="tots_nosaltres__prn">
      
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="totes_nosaltres__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/el_meu__prn">
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>les<b/>meues</l><r>el<b/>meu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>les<b/>meves</l><r>el<b/>meu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>la<b/>meua</l><r>el<b/>meu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>la<b/>meva</l><r>el<b/>meu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>els<b/>meus</l><r>el<b/>meu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>els<b/>meus</l><r>el<b/>meu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>el<b/>meu</l> <r>el<b/>meu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>el<b/>meu</l><r>el<b/>meu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/el_teu__prn">
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>les<b/>teues</l><r>el<b/>teu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>les<b/>teves</l><r>el<b/>teu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>la<b/>teua</l><r>el<b/>teu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>la<b/>teva</l><r>el<b/>teu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>els<b/>teus</l><r>el<b/>teu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>els<b/>teus</l><r>el<b/>teu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>el<b/>teu</l> <r>el<b/>teu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>el<b/>teu</l><r>el<b/>teu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/el_seu__prn">
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>les<b/>seues</l><r>el<b/>seu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>les<b/>seves</l><r>el<b/>seu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>la<b/>seua</l><r>el<b/>seu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>la<b/>seva</l><r>el<b/>seu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>els<b/>seus</l><r>el<b/>seu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>els<b/>seus</l><r>el<b/>seu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>el<b/>seu</l> <r>el<b/>seu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>el<b/>seu</l><r>el<b/>seu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/el_nostre__prn">
      
  <e>       <p><l>les<b/>nostres</l><r>el<b/>nostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>la<b/>nostra</l><r>el<b/>nostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>els<b/>nostres</l><r>el<b/>nostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>els<b/>nostres</l><r>el<b/>nostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>el<b/>nostre</l><r>el<b/>nostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>el<b/>nostre</l><r>el<b/>nostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/el_vostre__prn">
      
  <e>       <p><l>les<b/>vostres</l><r>el<b/>vostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>la<b/>vostra</l><r>el<b/>vostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>els<b/>vostres</l><r>el<b/>vostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>els<b/>vostres</l><r>el<b/>vostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>el<b/>vostre</l><r>el<b/>vostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>el<b/>vostre</l><r>el<b/>vostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="la majoria de">   <i>la<b/>majoria<b/></i><par n="/de__det"/></e>
<e lm="la majoria de">   <p><l>la<b/>majoria<b/>d'</l><r>la<b/>majoria<b/>de</r></p><par n="una_mica_de__det"/></e>
<e lm="poc">             <i>po</i><par n="po/c__det"/></e>
 <e lm="tot"><i>tot</i><par n="tot__predet"/></e>
<e lm="uns quants">      <i>un</i><par n="un/s_quants__det"/></e>
<e lm="una mica de">     <i>una<b/>mica<b/></i><par n="/de__det"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="una mica de"><p><l>una<b/>mica<b/>d'</l><r>una<b/>mica<b/>de</r></p><par n="una_mica_de__det"/></e>
<e lm="el meu"><par n="/el_meu__prn"/></e>
<e lm="el nostre"><par n="/el_nostre__prn"/></e>
<e lm="el seu"><par n="/el_seu__prn"/></e>
<e lm="el teu"><par n="/el_teu__prn"/></e>
<e lm="el vostre"><par n="/el_vostre__prn"/></e>
